Wyoming, session 2025, SF0037.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-8-105 is created to read:

6-8-105. Enhanced concealed carry permits;
requirements; authorized places for concealed carry with
enhanced permits.

SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
(a) The attorney general is authorized to issue an
enhanced concealed carry permit to qualified persons as
provided by this section.

(b) The attorney general shall:

(i) Promulgate rules necessary to carry out this
section;

(ii) Develop an application for the enhanced
concealed carry permit. The application shall contain, at a
minimum:

(A) Requirements for the applicant to
provide the applicant's name, physical address, physical
description, signature, date of birth, place of birth,
military status, citizenship and the driver's license
number or identification card number if used for
identification in applying for the license. If the
applicant is not a citizen of the United States, the
application shall require the applicant to provide any
alien or admission number issued to the applicant by the
SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
United States immigration and customs enforcement or any
successor agency;

(B) A place for the applicant to provide
the applicant's social security number, provided that the
application shall state that disclosure of the social
security number is optional;

(C) A statement that, to the best of his
knowledge, the applicant is in compliance with criteria
contained within this section;

(D) A statement that the applicant has been
furnished a copy of this section and W.S. 6-8-104 and is
knowledgeable of their provisions;

(E) A conspicuous warning that reads
substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Federal law and state law on the
possession of firearms differ. If you are
prohibited by federal law from possessing a
weapon or a firearm, you may be prosecuted in
SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
federal court. A state permit is not a defense to
a federal prosecution. A materially false answer
to any question or the submission of any
materially false document with this application
may result in the denial or revocation of a
permit and may subject you to criminal
prosecution under W.S. 6-5-303.

(iii) Make applications for enhanced concealed
carry permits available to and distributed by the division
of criminal investigation and local law enforcement
agencies;

(iv) Upon receiving a completed application
under this section, request a written report from the
sheriff in accordance with W.S. 6-8-104(g) and (h);

(v) Maintain an automated listing of enhanced
concealed carry permit holders and pertinent information,
and ensure that the information shall be available on-line,
upon request, at all times to all Wyoming law enforcement
agencies;

SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
(vi) Establish requirements for each applicant
or permittee to update the division and the sheriff on:

(A) A change in the applicant's or
permittee's address or place of residence;

(B) Notice that the permit is lost or
destroyed, in accordance with W.S. 6-8-104(o) and (p).

(vii) Establish a process by which a permittee
may obtain a duplicate or replacement license if the permit
is lost or destroyed;

(viii) Establish a process by which the
sheriff's office shall forward items received under this
section to the division, in accordance with W.S.
6-8-104(f).

(c) An applicant for an enhanced concealed carry
permit shall submit to the division through the sheriff's
office in the county of the applicant's residence:

SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
(i) A completed application as described in
paragraph (b)(ii) of this section;

(ii) A nonrefundable permit fee of fifty dollars
($50.00), if the applicant has not previously been issued a
statewide permit, or a nonrefundable permit fee of fifty
dollars ($50.00) for renewal of a permit;

(iii) A full set of fingerprints of the
applicant administered by a law enforcement agency. The
actual cost of processing the set of fingerprints required
in this paragraph shall be borne by the applicant;

(iv) Proof of familiarity with firearms as
specified in paragraph (d)(iii) of this section.

(d) To receive an enhanced concealed carry permit
under this section, an applicant shall:

(i) Satisfy each of the requirements specified
in W.S. 6-8-104(b)(i) through (vi), (viii) and (ix);

SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
(ii) Be the holder of a valid Wyoming driver's
license or other form of identification issued by the state
of Wyoming that has a picture of the person identified;

(iii) Provide proof to the division that the
applicant:

(A) Has successfully completed a qualifying
handgun course as provided in subsection (e) of this
section within the preceding twelve (12) months before
applying; or

(B) Is a current or former law enforcement
officer and has, within the preceding twelve (12) months
before applying, qualified or requalified on a certified
shooting course administered by a firearms instructor
approved by a Wyoming law enforcement agency.

(e) Except as provided in paragraph (d)(iii)(B) of
this section, each applicant for an enhanced concealed
carry permit under this section shall successfully
complete, not earlier than twelve (12) months before
applying for a permit under this section, a qualifying
SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
handgun course as specified in this subsection. The
division shall accept a course as qualifying under this
subsection if the course:

(i) Is taught by a certified instructor who is:

(A) Not prohibited from possessing firearms
under state or federal law; and

(B) Is certified by:

(I) The national rifle association, or
another nationally recognized organization that customarily
certifies firearms instructors, as an instructor in
personal protection with handguns; or

(II) The peace officer standards and
training commission as a firearms instructor.

(ii) Is for not less than eight (8) hours in
duration;

SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
(iii) Is taught face-to-face with both the
instructor and applicant in the same physical location, and
not by electronic or other means;

(iv) Includes instruction in:

(A) Wyoming law relating to firearms, the
possession of firearms and the use of deadly force.
Instruction under this subparagraph shall be provided by
either of the following:

(I) An active or emeritus member of
the Wyoming state bar; or

(II) A peace officer who is certified
as a peace officer by the peace officer standards and
training commission.

(B) The basic concepts of the safe and
responsible use of handguns;

(C) Self-defense principles;

SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
(D) Live fire training, including the
firing of not less than ninety-eight (98) rounds by the
applicant.

(v) Provides to the applicant a copy of the
syllabus for the course, a written description of the
courses of fire used and the name of the person providing
the instruction under subparagraph (iv)(A) of this
subsection. The applicant shall provide the information
specified in this paragraph to the sheriff or the division
upon application for a permit under this section.

(f) The division shall, upon receiving all items
required for an application under this section, process the
full set of fingerprints of the applicant for any criminal
justice information. The division shall submit a
fingerprint card to the federal bureau of investigation for
a national background check. The cost of processing the
fingerprints shall be payable to the division. The division
shall, not later than sixty (60) days after the date of
receipt of the items specified in subsection (c) of this
section, either:

SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
(i) Issue the enhanced concealed carry permit;
or

(ii) Deny the application based on the ground
that the applicant fails to qualify under the criteria
listed in subsection (d) of this section or W.S.
6-8-104(c). If the division denies the application, it
shall notify the applicant in writing, stating the grounds
for denial and informing the applicant of a right to
submit, within thirty (30) days, any additional
documentation relating to the grounds of denial. Upon
receiving any additional documentation, the division shall
reconsider its decision and inform the applicant within
twenty (20) days of the result of the reconsideration. The
applicant shall further be informed of the right to seek
review of the denial in the district court pursuant to the
Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, W.S. 16-3-101 through
16-3-115. No person who is denied a permit under this
section shall carry a concealed firearm under an enhanced
concealed carry permit issued under this section or the
laws of another state, so long as the person remains a
resident of this state and remains ineligible for an
enhanced concealed carry permit in this state. Nothing in
SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
this paragraph shall be construed to deny a person to carry
a concealed firearm under W.S. 6-8-104(a)(i) through (iv)
if the person qualifies to carry a concealed firearm as
provided by those paragraphs.

(g) Permits issued under this section shall be valid
for five (5) years from the date of issuance. The permittee
shall carry the permit, together with valid identification
at all times when the permittee is carrying a concealed
firearm and shall display both the permit and proper
identification upon request of any peace officer. A person
who holds an enhanced concealed carry permit under this
section may renew the permit on or before the expiration
date by filing a renewal form with the sheriff of the
person's county of residence and a notarized affidavit
stating that the person remains qualified based on the
criteria specified in this section. The person shall also
submit a renewal fee as specified in paragraph (c)(ii) of
this section and submit proof that the person has completed
a required firearms course under subsection (e) of this
section not earlier than twelve (12) months before applying
for renewal or that the person meets the requirements of
subparagraph (d)(iii)(B) of this section. The division
SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
shall verify that the criminal history information
available to the division does not show that possession of
a firearm by the applicant would constitute a violation of
state or federal law. No permit shall be renewed six (6)
months or more after its expiration date, and the permit
shall be deemed to be permanently expired. A person whose
permit has permanently expired may reapply for a permit in
accordance with this section.

(h) The division shall revoke a permit issued under
this section:

(i) If the permittee becomes ineligible to be
issued a permit under the criteria provided in this
section; or

(ii) For any conviction of or a plea of no
contest to:

(A) Any offense involving a controlled
substance;

SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
(B) Alcohol-related offenses while carrying
a concealed weapon; or

(C) Any crime of violence or violent
felony.

(j) The division or the sheriff of the permittee's
county of residence shall have the authority to revoke an
enhanced concealed carry permit issued under this section.
The sheriff shall notify the division not later than three
(3) days after a revocation under this subsection. The
division or the sheriff shall have the authority to revoke
an enhanced concealed carry permit for any of the following
reasons:

(i) Fraud or intentional misrepresentation in
the obtaining or renewal of a permit under this section;

(ii) Misuse of a permit, including lending or
giving a license to another person, duplicating a license
or using a license with the intent to unlawfully cause harm
to a person or property;

SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
(iii) Committing an act or the existence of a
condition that would have been grounds for the denial of
the permit, including an act or condition specified in
subsection (d) of this section;

(iv) The violation of any of the provisions of
this section;

(v) The applicant or permittee is convicted of
or receives a deferred judgment for an offense that would
have disqualified the applicant or permittee from initially
receiving a permit under this section.

(k) All monies collected by the division under this
section shall be deposited in the general fund. All funds
received by the sheriff under this section shall be
deposited into the general fund of the county.

(m) Not later than March 1 of each year, the division
shall submit a statistical report to the governor and to
the joint judiciary interim committee listing the number of
enhanced concealed carry permits issued, revoked, suspended
and denied.
SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006

(n) A person who possesses a valid enhanced concealed
carry permit under this section may, in addition to all
other locations authorized by law, carry a concealed weapon
into:

(i) Any school, college or professional athletic
event not related to firearms, except that employees shall
remain subject to W.S. 21-3-132;

(ii) Any elementary or secondary school
facility, except that employees shall remain subject to
W.S. 21-3-132;

(iii) Any college or university facility.

Section 2. W.S. 6-8-104(a)(ii), (t)(vi), (ix) and
(x), 19-13-104(e)(vi) and 21-3-132(a) and (c)(i) are
amended to read:

6-8-104. Wearing or carrying concealed weapons;
penalties; exceptions; permits.

SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
(a) A person who wears or carries a concealed deadly
weapon is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of
not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00),
imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6)
months, or both for a first offense, or a felony punishable
by a fine of not more than two thousand dollars
($2,000.00), imprisonment for not more than two (2) years,
or both, for a second or subsequent offense, unless:

(ii) The person possesses a permit under this
section or under W.S. 6-8-105;

(t) No person authorized to carry a concealed weapon
pursuant to paragraphs (a)(ii) through (iv) of this section
shall carry a concealed firearm into:

(vi) Any school, college or professional
athletic event not related to firearms, except as provided
in W.S. 6-8-105(n) and 21-3-132;

(ix) Any elementary or secondary school
facility, except as provided in W.S. 6-8-105(n) and
21-3-132;
SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006

(x) Any college or university facility without
the written consent of the security service of the college
or university, except as provided in W.S. 6-8-105(n); or

19-13-104. Powers of governor generally; director,
office of homeland security.

(e) With the exception of regulating governmental
entities who engage in the activities described in this
section or who operate an indoor or outdoor shooting range,
nothing in this chapter shall be construed to confer upon
the governor, the director, the executive heads or
governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the
state, sheriffs, chiefs of police or any employee or agent
of the state or any governmental unit within the state the
power to:

(vi) Suspend or revoke a permit to carry a
concealed weapon issued pursuant to W.S. 6-8-104 or
6-8-105, unless the suspension or revocation is authorized
and completed pursuant to W.S. 6-8-104 or 6-8-105.

SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
21-3-132. Possession of firearms on school property.

(a) The board of trustees in each school district may
adopt rules and regulations, in consultation with local law
enforcement, to allow the possession of firearms by
employees possessing a valid concealed carry permit under
W.S. 6-8-104 or a valid enhanced concealed carry permit
under W.S. 6-8-105 on or in any property or facility owned
or leased by the school district. Employees of a school
district who hold a valid concealed carry permit issued
under W.S. 6-8-104 or a valid enhanced concealed carry
permit issued under W.S. 6-8-105 may carry a concealed
firearm on or into school facilities or other areas
designated by the board of trustees, provided the employing
school district has adopted rules and regulations that
allow possession of firearms on school property and the
employee has received approval by the board of trustees as
required by this section.

(c) The rules required by subsection (a) of this
section shall at a minimum:

SF0037

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0006
(i) Establish an application and approval
process for employees possessing a valid concealed carry
permit under W.S. 6-8-104 or a valid enhanced concealed
carry permit under W.S. 6-8-105 to carry a firearm on
school property;

Section 3. The attorney general shall promulgate all
rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0037